Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF289.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 SF 289 (3) 91 as/js/mb S.F. 289 Section 1. Section 709.21, subsection 1, unnumbered 1 paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 A person who knowingly views, photographs, or films another 3 person, for the purpose of arousing or gratifying the sexual 4 desire of any person, or who knowingly possesses, for no 5 legitimate purpose, such photograph or film, commits invasion 6 of privacy if all of the following apply: 7 -1- SF 289 (3) 91 as/js/mb 1/ 1